Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5295SS (4) 91 as/js S.F. 2163 Section 1. Section 718.6, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. A person who reports or causes to be reported false 3 information to a fire department, a law enforcement authority, 4 or other public safety entity, knowing that the information is 5 false, or who reports the alleged occurrence of a criminal act, 6 knowing the act did not occur, commits a class âDâ felony if 7 the alleged criminal act reported is any of the following: 8 a. (1) A forcible felony under section 702.11 . 9 b. (2) Intimidation with a dangerous weapon under section 10 708.6 . 11 c. (3) An act of terrorism under chapter 708A . 12 d. (4) Unlawful possession of biological agents or diseases 13 under chapter 708B . 14 e. (5) Any offense under chapter 712 . 15 b. Any person who continues to make allegations of an 16 alleged occurrence of a criminal act after the allegations are 17 proven to be false may be charged with malicious prosecution 18 under section 720.6. 19 3. If the reported false information involves a criminal 20 act under subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , and the reported false 21 information results in serious bodily injury to or the death 22 of another person, the person reporting the false information 23 commits a class âCâ felony. For purposes of this subsection , a 24 person causes serious bodily injury or death when the report 25 of false information contributes to the other personâs serious 26 bodily injury or death. 27 Sec. 2. Section 720.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 720.6 Malicious prosecution. 30 A person who causes or attempts to cause another to be 31 indicted or prosecuted for any public offense, having no 32 reasonable grounds for believing that the person committed the 33 offense commits a serious an aggravated misdemeanor. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 5295SS (4) 91 as/js 1/ 2 S.F. 2163 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to false accusations of criminal acts. 3 Current law provides that a person who reports the alleged 4 occurrence of a criminal act, knowing the act did not occur, 5 commits a serious misdemeanor or a class âDâ felony depending 6 on the nature of the alleged offense. 7 The bill provides that any person who continues to make 8 allegations of an alleged occurrence of a criminal act after 9 the allegations are proven to be false may be charged with 10 malicious prosecution under Code section 720.6, which the 11 bill changes from a serious misdemeanor to an aggravated 12 misdemeanor. An aggravated misdemeanor is punishable by 13 confinement for no more than two years and a fine of at least 14 $855 but not more than $8,540. 15 -2- LSB 5295SS (4) 91 as/js 2/ 2